Utah statutes.
16-10a-1106.   Effect of merger or share exchange.
(1)  When a merger takes effect:
(a)  Every other corporation party to the merger merges into the surviving
corporation and the separate existence of every corporation except the
surviving corporation ceases.
(b)  The title to all real estate and other property owned by each corporation
party to the merger is transferred to and vested in the surviving corporation
without reversion or impairment. The transfer to and vesting in the surviving
corporation occurs by operation of law.  No consent or approval of any other
person is required in connection with the transfer or vesting unless consent
or approval is specifically required in the event of merger by law or by
express provision in any contract, agreement, decree, order, or other
instrument to which any of the corporations so merged is a party or by which
it is bound.
(c)  The surviving corporation has all liabilities of each corporation party
to the merger.
(d)  A proceeding pending against any corporation party to the merger may be
continued as if the merger did not occur, or the surviving corporation may be
substituted in the proceeding for the corporation whose existence ceased.
(e)  The articles of incorporation of the surviving corporation are amended to
the extent provided in the plan of merger.
(f)  The shares of each corporation party to the merger, which are to be
converted into shares, obligations, or other securities of the surviving or
any other corporation or into money or other property, are converted, and the
former holders of the shares are entitled only to the rights provided in the
articles of merger or to their rights under Part 13.
(2)  When a share exchange takes effect, the shares of each acquired
corporation are exchanged as provided in the plan, and the former holders of
the shares are entitled only to the exchange rights provided in the articles
of share exchange or to their rights under Part 13.
